en: Tool Accessories
xx: Tool Accessories
cs: Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství
da: Værktøj – tilbehør
de: Werkzeugzubehör
es: Accesorios para herramientas
fr: Accessoires d'outils
it: Accessori per attrezzi
ja: 工具関連用品
nl: Gereedschapaccessoires
no: Verktøytilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do narzędzi
pt: Acessórios para ferramentas
ru: Принадлежности для инструментов
sv: Verktygstillbehör
tr: Alet Aksesuarları

en: Abrasive Blaster Accessories
xx: Abrasive Blaster Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k pískovačkám
da: Sandblæser – tilbehør
de: Sandstrahler-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para granallado
fr: Accessoires de sablage
it: Accessori per sabbiatura
ja: サンドブラスター関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor zandstralers
no: Tilbehør til sandblåsere
pl: Akcesoria do piaskowania
pt: Acessórios para jateadores de areia
ru: Принадлежности для пескоструйных аппаратов
sv: Sandblästertillbehör
tr: Kumlama Aksesuarları

en: Sandblasting Cabinets
xx: Sandblasting Cabinets
cs: Pískovací boxy
da: Sandblæser – kabinetter
de: Sandstrahlkabinen
es: Muebles para pulido
fr: Armoires pour sablage
it: Dispositivi per sabbiatura
ja: サンドブラストキャビネット
nl: Zandstraalkasten
no: Kabinetter til sandblåsing
pl: Kabiny do piaskowania
pt: Estruturas para jateadores de areia
ru: Шкафы для пескоструйных аппаратов
sv: Sandblästerskåp
tr: Kumlama Kabinleri

en: Axe Accessories
xx: Axe Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k sekerám
da: Tilbehør til økser
de: Axtzubehör
es: Accesorios para hachas
fr: Accessoires pour haches
it: Accessori per asce
ja: 斧関連用品
nl: Bijlaccessoires
no: Tilbehør til øks
pl: Akcesoria do siekier
pt: Acessórios para machado
ru: Принадлежности для топоров
sv: Yxtillbehör
tr: Balta Aksesuarları

en: Axe Handles
xx: Axe Handles
cs: Topůrka seker
da: Øksehåndtag
de: Axtgriffe
es: Mangos para hachas
fr: Manches de hache
it: Manici per asce
ja: 斧柄
nl: Bijlstelen
no: Økseskaft
pl: Rękojeści siekier
pt: Cabos para machado
ru: Топорища
sv: Yxskaft
tr: Balta Sapları

en: Axe Heads
xx: Axe Heads
cs: Hlavy seker
da: Øksehoveder
de: Axtköpfe
es: Cabezas para hachas
fr: Têtes de haches
it: Teste per asce
ja: 斧頭
nl: Bijlbladen
no: Øksehoder
pl: Głowice siekier
pt: Lâminas para machado
ru: Головки топоров
sv: Yxhuvuden
tr: Balta Kafaları

en: Cutter Accessories
xx: Cutter Accessories
cs: Střihací a řezací nástroje – příslušenství
da: Fræsertilbehør
de: Schneidwerkzeug-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para cúteres
fr: Accessoires pour outils de coupe
it: Accessori per taglierine
ja: カッター関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor snijmachines
no: Tilbehør til pappkniv
pl: Akcesoria do nożyc
pt: Acessórios de corte
ru: Принадлежности для резаков
sv: Tillbehör till skärare
tr: Kesici Aksesuarları

en: Nibbler Dies
xx: Nibbler Dies
cs: Raznice
da: Stempel til pladestanser
de: Nibbelmaschinenstempel
es: Perfiles para mordiscadoras
fr: Matrices pour grignoteuses
it: Pinze di serraggio con dado
ja: ニブラー用ダイス
nl: Matrijzen voor knabbelscharen
no: Matriser til nibblere
pl: Noże do wycinarek
pt: Ponteiras para tesouras de punção
ru: Пуансоны и матрицы для вырубных ножниц
sv: Matriser för nibblare
tr: Sac Kesici Kalıpları

en: Drill & Screwdriver Accessories
xx: Drill & Screwdriver Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k vrtačkám
da: Bor – tilbehør
de: Bohrzubehör
es: Accesorios para taladros y destornilladores
fr: Accessoires pour perceuses et visseuses
it: Accessori per trapani e cacciavite
ja: ドリル関連用品
nl: Booraccessoires
no: Tilbehør til driller og skrutrekkere
pl: Akcesoria do wiercenia
pt: Acessórios para furadeiras
ru: Принадлежности для сверления
sv: Tillbehör till borrmaskiner och skruvdragare
tr: Matkap ve Tornavide Aksesuarları

en: Drill & Screwdriver Bits
xx: Drill & Screwdriver Bits
cs: Vrtáky
da: Borebit
de: Bohrer & Bits
es: Brocas de taladro y cabezales de destornillador
fr: Forets et embouts de tournevis
it: Punte di trapano e cacciavite
ja: ドリルビット
nl: Boortjes
no: Bor til driller og skrutrekkere
pl: Wiertła
pt: Brocas para furadeiras
ru: Свёрла
sv: Borr- och skruvdragarbits
tr: Matkap ve Tornavida Uçları

en: Drill Bit Extensions
xx: Drill Bit Extensions
cs: Nástavce na vrtáky
da: Borebit – forlængere
de: Bohrerverlängerungen
es: Extensiones para brocas de taladro
fr: Extensions de forets
it: Adattatori e estensioni per punte di trapano
ja: ドリルビット延長ロッド
nl: Boorverlengstukken
no: Borforlengere
pl: Przedłużenia do wierteł
pt: Extensões para brocas
ru: Удлинения сверла
sv: Borrförlängningar
tr: Matkap Ucu Uzatma Adaptörleri

en: Drill Bit Sharpeners
xx: Drill Bit Sharpeners
cs: Ostřiče vrtáků
da: Borebit – slibere
de: Bohrerschleifgeräte
es: Afiladores para brocas
fr: Affûteuses de forets
it: Affilatori per punte di trapano
ja: ドリル研磨機
nl: Boorslijpers
no: Borslipere
pl: Ostrzałki do wierteł
pt: Afiadores de brocas
ru: Точило для сверл
sv: Borrslipmaskiner
tr: Matkap Ucu Bileme Makineleri

en: Drill Chucks
xx: Drill Chucks
cs: Sklíčidla pro vrtačky
da: Borepatron
de: Bohrfutter
es: Portabrocas
fr: Mandrins
it: Mandrini
ja: ドリルチャック
nl: Boorhouders
no: Borchuck
pl: Głowice do wiertarek
pt: Mandris para furadeiras
ru: Сверлильные патроны
sv: Borrchuck
tr: Matkap Bağlama Aynaları

en: Drill Stands & Guides
xx: Drill Stands & Guides
cs: Stojany na vrtačku
da: Borestativer og styreskinner
de: Bohrständer & -führungen
es: Soportes y guías para taladros
fr: Supports et guides de perçage
it: Guide e supporti per punte
ja: ドリルスタンド・ドリルガイド
nl: Boorstandaards en -geleiders
no: Styreskinner og stativer til drill
pl: Stojaki i prowadnice do wiertarek
pt: Suportes e guias para furadeiras
ru: Сверлильные стойки и направляющие
sv: Borrmaskinställ och borrstativ
tr: Matkap Stantları ve Kılavuzları

en: Hole Saws
xx: Hole Saws
cs: Pily děrovky
da: Hulsave
de: Lochsägen
es: Sierras perforadoras
fr: Scie cloche
it: Sega a tazza
ja: ホールソー
nl: Gatenzagen
no: Hullsager
pl: Otwornice
pt: Serras-copo
ru: Кольцевые пилы
sv: Hålsågar
tr: Delik Testereleri

en: Driver Accessories
xx: Driver Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k utahovákům
da: Drivhjul – tilbehør
de: Drehmaschinenzubehör
es: Accesorios para destornilladores eléctricos
fr: Accessoires pour perceuses
it: Accessori per conducenti
ja: ドライバー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor aandrijvingen
no: Slagnøkkeltilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do wkrętarek
pt: Acessórios para propulsores
ru: Принадлежности для гайковертов
sv: Mejseltillbehör
tr: Sökme Takma Aleti Aksesuarları

en: Flashlight Accessories
xx: Flashlight Accessories
cs: Svítilny – příslušenství
da: Lygte – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Taschenlampen
es: Accesorios para linterna
fr: Accessoires de lampe de poche
it: Accessori torce elettriche
ja: 懐中電灯関連用品
nl: Zaklampaccessoires
no: Lommelykttilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do latarek
pt: Acessórios para lanternas
ru: Принадлежности для фонарей
sv: Tillbehör till ficklampor
tr: El Feneri Aksesuarları

en: Grinder Accessories
xx: Grinder Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k bruskám
da: Tilbehør til slibemaskine
de: Schleifmaschinenzubehör
es: Accesorios para rectificadoras
fr: Accessoires pour meuleuses
it: Accessori per smerigliatrici
ja: グラインダー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor slijpmachines
no: Tilbehør til slipemaskiner
pl: Akcesoria do szlifierek
pt: Acessórios para rebarbadoras
ru: Принадлежности для шлифовальных машин
sv: Kvarntillbehör
tr: Taşlama Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Grinding Wheels & Points
xx: Grinding Wheels & Points
cs: Brusné kotouče a hroty
da: Slibeskiver og -spidser
de: Schleifscheiben & -stifte
es: Muelas y puntas de rectificado
fr: Meules et pointes montées
it: Dischi e punte per smerigliatrici
ja: グラインダー用ホイール・ポイント
nl: Slijpschijven en -stiften
no: Skiver og spisser til slipemaskiner
pl: Kamienie i tarcze szlifierskie
pt: Discos e rebolos para esmeril
ru: Шлифовальные диски и насадки
sv: Sliphjul och slippunkter
tr: Taşlama Makinesi Taşları ve Uçları

en: Hammer Accessories
xx: Hammer Accessories
cs: Příslušenství ke kladivům
da: Hammer – tilbehør
de: Hammerzubehör
es: Accesorios para martillos
fr: Accessoires pour marteaux
it: Accessori per martelli
ja: ハンマー関連用品
nl: Hameraccessoires
no: Hammertilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do młotków
pt: Acessórios para martelos
ru: Принадлежности для молотков
sv: Tillbehör till hammare
tr: Çekiç Aksesuarları